Indiana, session 2026, HB1067.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 24-4-27 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 27. Reporting of Grocery Store Staple Pricing
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, a covered grocery chain's
"average retail price" of an item for a calendar month is the sales
weighted, average unit price charged by the covered grocery chain
to Indiana consumers for the item during the calendar month:
(1) inclusive of discounts, promotions, and loyalty pricing;
and
(2) exclusive of sales tax.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, a covered grocery chain's
"average wholesale price" for an item for a calendar month is the
average sales weighted, per unit, landed cost of the item to the
covered grocery chain during the calendar month:
(1) including base invoice price and inbound freight and
distribution charges, minus any off invoice allowances and
2026 IN 1067—LS 6423/DI 119


vendor funded promotions attributable to the units of the item
paid for by the covered grocery chain in the calendar month;
and
(2) excluding any lump sum rebate that is:
(A) paid to the covered grocery chain after the calendar
month; and
(B) not specifically attributable to the units of the item paid
for by the covered grocery chain in the calendar month.
Sec. 3. (a) As used in this chapter, "covered grocery chain"
means a person that operates or franchises five (5) or more retail
food stores physically located in Indiana.
(b) A retail food store, however designated, including:
(1) an affiliate;
(2) a subsidiary;
(3) a franchise; or
(4) a specialty retailer;
that is operated under the person's common branding or supply
chain control is considered to be a retail food store operated by the
person for purposes of subsection (a).
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "department" means the Indiana
state department of agriculture established under IC 15-11-2.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "essential staple" means any of
the following:
(1) One (1) gallon of pasteurized white cow's milk.
(2) One (1) dozen Grade A large chicken eggs.
(3) One (1) loaf, at least twenty (20) ounces but not more than
twenty-four (24) ounces in weight, of sliced white sandwich
bread.
(4) Raw, boneless, skinless chicken breast, priced per pound.
(5) Raw ground beef, eighty percent (80%) lean and twenty
percent (20%) fat, priced per pound.
(6) Infant formula.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "NAICS code" refers to the code
used to classify an industry in the most recently published edition
of the North American Industry Classification System Manual -
United States, published by the National Technical Information
Service of the United States Department of Commerce.
Sec. 7. (a) As used in this chapter, "retail food store" means a
commercial establishment primarily engaged in the sale of food
and beverages for off-premises consumption as classified under
NAICS code 445110, including supermarket and warehouse club
formats.
2026 IN 1067—LS 6423/DI 119


(b) The term does not include convenience stores primarily
engaged in the retail sale of a limited line of goods as classified
under NAICS code 445120, unless the store regularly offers for sale
all of the items listed in section 5 of this chapter.
Sec. 8. As used in this chapter, "SKU" means the alphanumeric
code used by a retailer to identify a product sold by the retailer for
the purpose of tracking the retailer's inventory of the product.
Sec. 9. As used in this chapter, "store brand" means an item
sold under a brand name:
(1) owned by;
(2) licensed exclusively to; or
(3) otherwise controlled by;
a covered grocery chain or the covered grocery chain's affiliated
wholesaler.
Sec. 10. (a) Each month, a covered grocery chain shall submit to
the department, in the form and manner prescribed in rules
adopted by the department under section 12 of this chapter, a
report containing the following information for the immediately
preceding calendar month with regard to the store brand of each
essential staple the covered grocery chain sells in Indiana:
(1) The average retail price.
(2) The average wholesale price.
(3) Total units sold by the covered grocery chain in Indiana.
(4) Any temporary or permanent product discontinuation or
substitution relevant to the comparability of:
(A) the information included in the report with regard to
an essential staple; and
(B) the information previously reported under this section
by the covered grocery chain with regard to the essential
staple.
(b) Notwithstanding any rule adopted, or guidance issued, by
the department under section 12 of this chapter, a covered grocery
chain must use reasonable and consistently applied methods to
derive state level:
(1) average retail prices; and
(2) average wholesale prices;
specific to Indiana.
(c) The report under subsection (a) must specify the following:
(1) The fat content of the pasteurized white cow's milk for
which information is included in the report.
(2) The net weight of the loaf of sliced white sandwich bread
for which information is included in the report.
2026 IN 1067—LS 6423/DI 119


(3) The following information regarding the infant formula
for which information is included in the report:
(A) Each form in which the infant formula is sold by the
covered grocery chain in Indiana.
(B) The:
(i) net weight; and
(ii) price per ounce;
of each form reported under clause (A).
(d) If a covered grocery chain does not sell a store brand of an
essential staple in Indiana, the covered grocery chain shall
designate the essential staple as "Not Offered" in the report under
subsection (a).
(e) If a covered grocery chain sells more than one (1) store
brand of an essential staple in Indiana, the covered grocery chain
shall include in the report under subsection (a):
(1) a single Indiana sales weighted average for the essential
staple; and
(2) each SKU under which the covered grocery chain sells the
essential staple in Indiana.
(f) A covered grocery chain shall submit the report under
subsection (a) not later than the fifteenth day of the month
immediately following the month covered by the report. If the
fifteenth day of a month falls on a weekend or state holiday, a
covered grocery chain shall submit the report not later than the
next business day.
(g) A covered grocery chain's report under subsection (a) must
be attested to by an officer or authorized representative of the
covered grocery chain as true and correct to the best of the
representative's knowledge after reasonable inquiry.
(h) A covered grocery chain shall:
(1) maintain underlying records sufficient to substantiate the
data reported by the covered grocery chain under this section
for the immediately preceding three (3) years; and
(2) make the records under subdivision (1) available to the
department for audit upon reasonable notice by the
department.
Sec. 11. (a) The department shall establish and maintain an
online dashboard through which members of the public can view
and compare the data reported to the department under this
chapter.
(b) The department shall make the information reported to the
department under this chapter for a calendar month available on
2026 IN 1067—LS 6423/DI 119


the dashboard not later than fifteen (15) days after the information
is required to be reported under section 10(f) of this chapter.
(c) The dashboard must enable users of the dashboard to:
(1) compare reported data:
(A) over time; and
(B) across covered grocery chains; and
(2) access archived data reported under this chapter for at
least the five (5) immediately preceding years.
(d) The department shall not publish personally identifiable
consumer information on the dashboard.
(e) The department may:
(1) aggregate; or
(2) delay by not more than thirty (30) days the publication of;
average wholesale price information for the purpose of minimizing
prospective price signaling.
Sec. 12. (a) The department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
to:
(1) standardize methodologies for calculation of average retail
price and average wholesale price, including acceptable cost
accounting practices and allocation methods, for purposes of
this chapter;
(2) prescribe the electronic format, data fields, and attestation
required for a report under section 10 of this chapter;
(3) specify treatment of discounts, off invoice allowances, and
vendor funded promotions for purposes of required reporting
under this chapter;
(4) define acceptable product substitutions to preserve
comparability of data when SKUs change; and
(5) establish audit procedures and documentation for
purposes of this chapter.
(b) The department may issue guidance to harmonize reporting
under this chapter to the extent that national or regional
procurement by covered grocery chains obscures Indiana specific
costs incurred by covered grocery chains.
Sec. 13. (a) Failure to file a complete and accurate report when
and as required under this chapter is a deceptive act under
IC 24-5-0.5-3.
(b) The attorney general shall enforce this chapter and may,
subject to subsection (e), bring a civil action on behalf of the state
against a covered grocery chain that violates this chapter.
(c) In addition to the remedies available under IC 24-5-0.5-3, a
court may assess the following civil penalties for a violation of this
2026 IN 1067—LS 6423/DI 119


chapter:
(1) Not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day that
a report required under section 10 of this chapter is late.
(2) Not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for willful
reporting of materially false information under this chapter.
(3) Injunctive relief, including orders compelling the
production of reports or records.
(d) Each failure by a covered grocery chain to report
information regarding any one (1) required staple, in any one (1)
calendar month, as required under this chapter constitutes a
separate violation of this chapter.
(e) The attorney general:
(1) shall provide a covered grocery chain a seven (7) day cure
period before filing a civil action against the covered grocery
chain under this section based solely on the covered grocery
chain's failure to submit a report under this chapter by the
date required under this chapter; and
(2) if the covered grocery chain submits the delinquent report
not later than the end of the cure period under subdivision (1),
shall not bring an action against the covered grocery chain
under this section for the covered grocery chain's failure to
submit the report by the date required under this chapter.
Sec. 14. Reporting of data by covered grocery chains, and
publication of the data by the department, under this chapter may
not be construed as an agreement, combination, or conspiracy in
restraint of trade. However, this section does not legalize conduct
that is otherwise unlawful under state or federal antitrust law.
2026 IN 1067—LS 6423/DI 119